Washington statutes.
RCW 36.62.030

Hospital may be jointly owned and operated.

Any number of counties or any county and any city in which the county seat of the county is situated may contract one with the other for the joint purchase, acquisition, ownership, control, and disposition of land and other property suitable as a site for a county hospital.

[ 1963 c 4 s 36.62.030. Prior: 1947 c 228 s 1, part; 1925 ex.s. c 174 s 1, part; Rem. Supp. 1947 s 6090-1, part.]